Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.170

Teacher's use of sexual orientation curriculum.

A teacher's evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 may not be negatively impacted if a teacher chooses to use curriculum or instructional materials that address subject matter related to sexual orientation including gender expression or identity so long as the subject matter is age-appropriate and connected to the teacher's content area.

[ 2019 c 194 s 4.]